test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-viettar_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - viettâr: # 1B - ok
    viettâr+N+Sg+Nom: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Gen: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Acc: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Ill: vieˊtârân
    viettâr+N+Sg+Loc: vieˊtârist
    viettâr+N+Sg+Com: vieˊtâráin
    viettâr+N+Sg+Abe: viettârttáá
    viettâr+N+Ess: vieˊtârin 
    viettâr+N+Par: vieˊtârid 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Nom: vieˊtâreh
    viettâr+N+Pl+Gen: vieˊtârij
    viettâr+N+Pl+Acc: vieˊtârijd 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Ill: vieˊtâráid 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Loc: vieˊtârijn 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Com: vieˊtârijguin
    viettâr+N+Pl+Abe: vieˊtârijttáá
